Arkansas, session 2025, HB1239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b), concerning education
categories of funding in addition to state foundation funding aid, is amended
to add an additional subdivision read as follows:
(7)(A) For the 2025-2026 school year and each school year
thereafter, special education funding shall be three thousand eighty hundred
sixty-two dollars ($3,862) multiplied by the number of students who receive
special education and related services required by an individualized
education plan.
(B) Funding for students who receive special education and
related services required by an individualized education plan under
subdivision (b)(7)(A) of this section shall be distributed based on rules
promulgated by the state board.
(C) Funding for students who receive special education and
related services required by an individualized education plan shall not be
incorporated into the state foundation funding aid amount established under
*TNL132*
01/27/2025 8:57:02 AM TNL132

HB1239
subsection (a) of this section.



































01/27/2025 8:57:02 AM TNL132